South Dakota, session 2026, HB1072.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is appropriated $8,454,195 from the general fund, $3,524,321 in federal
fund expenditure authority, and $8,678,462 in other fund expenditure authority, to the
Bureau of Finance and Management, for a payment to each state employee of one and a half
percent of the employee's current salary.
Section 2. The Bureau of Finance and Management shall distribute the amounts appropriated
in section 1 of this Act to each state agency and other state governmental entity, having at
least one state employee, to cover the requirements of section 3 of this Act.
Section 3. Starting July 1, 2026, each state employee employed as of January 1, 2026, shall
be paid at the beginning of each month one twelfth of one and a half percent of the employee's
annualized January 1, 2026 salary. If a state employee is no longer employed with the state
as of the payment date, no payment may be made to the employee.
Section 4. The commissioner of the Bureau of Finance and Management shall approve
vouchers and the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 5. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated by June
30, 2027, shall revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 6. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.